Utah statutes.
23-22-2.   Acceptance of Acts of Congress.

(1)  The state assents to the provisions of 16 U.S.C. Sec. 669 et seq., Wildlife Restoration Act and 16 U.S.C. 777 et seq., Sport Fish Restoration Act.

(2)  The division shall conduct and establish cooperative fish and wildlife restoration projects as provided by the acts specified in Subsection (1) and rules promulgated under those acts.

(3)  The following revenues received by the state may not be used for any purpose other than the administration of the division:

(a)  revenue from the sale of any license, permit, tag, stamp, or certificate of registration that conveys to a person the privilege to take wildlife for sport or recreation, less reasonable vendor fees;

(b)  revenue from the sale, lease, rental, or other granting of rights of real or personal property acquired with revenue specified in Subsection (3)(a);

(c)  interest, dividends, or other income earned on revenue specified in Subsection (3)(a) or (b); and

(d)  federal aid project reimbursements to the extent that revenue specified in Subsection (3)(a) or (b) originally funded the project for which the reimbursement is being made.

